Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-387
Violations; penalty.

In the event of violation of any provision of sections 23-383 to 23-388 by any person or entity furnishing community antenna television service, the county having granted such permit shall immediately serve notice of such violation upon the permitholder with directions to correct such violation within ninety days or show cause why such violation should not be corrected at a public hearing held in conjunction with the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board. Continued violation of sections 23-383 to 23-388 may be enjoined by the district court. Any person who willfully violates any provision of sections 23-383 to 23-388 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor for each offense.

Laws 1971, LB 257, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 90.